Tennessee, session 114, SB0692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-33-106, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(f) No later than March 1 of each year, the attorney general and reporter shall
report to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives:
(1) The number of violations of this chapter reported to the attorney
general and reporter;
(2) The number of actions brought against a healthcare provider or any
person who knowingly violates this chapter; and
(3) The amount of civil penalties recovered for violations of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0692
001316
- 1 -